Utah statutes.
78A-6-1208.   Youth Court Board -- Membership -- Responsibilities.
(1)  The Utah attorney general's office shall provide staff support and
assistance to a Youth Court Board comprised of the following:
(a)  the Utah attorney general or his designee;
(b)  one member of the Utah Prosecution Council;
(c)  one member from the Board of Juvenile Court Judges;
(d)  the juvenile court administrator or his designee;
(e)  one person from the Office of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency
Prevention;
(f)  the state superintendent of education or his designee;
(g)  two representatives from Youth Courts based primarily in schools;
(h)  two representatives from Youth Courts based primarily in communities;
(i)  one member from the law enforcement community; and
(j)  one member from the community at large.
(2)  The members selected to fill the positions in Subsections (1)(a) through
(f) shall jointly select the members to fill the positions in Subsections
(1)(g) through (j).
(3)  Members shall serve two-year staggered terms beginning July 1, 1999,
except the initial terms of the members designated by Subsections (1)(a), (c),
(e), and (i), and one of the members from Subsections (1)(g) and (h) shall
serve one-year terms, but may be reappointed for a full two-year term upon the
expiration of their initial term.
(4)  The Youth Court Board shall meet at least quarterly to:
(a)  set minimum standards for the establishment of Youth Courts, including an
application process, membership and training requirements, and the
qualifications for the adult coordinator;
(b)  review certification applications; and
(c)  provide for a process to recertify each Youth Court every three years.
(5)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the Youth Court Board shall make rules to accomplish the requirements of
Subsection (3).
(6)  The Youth Court Board may deny certification or recertification, or
withdraw the certification of any Youth Court for failure to comply with
program requirements.
(7) (a)  Members shall receive no compensation or benefits for their services,
but may receive per diem and expenses incurred in the performance of the
member's official duties at the rates established by the Division of Finance
under Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.
(b)  Members may decline to receive per diem and expenses for their service.
(8)  The Youth Court Board shall provide a list of certified Youth Courts to
the Board of Juvenile Court Judges, all law enforcement agencies in the state,
all school districts, and the Utah Prosecution Council by December 31 of each
year.
